District of Columbia statutes.
22-2601

Escape from institution or officer.

(a)

No person shall escape or attempt to escape from:

(1)

Any penal or correctional institution or facility in which that person is confined pursuant to an order issued by a court of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The lawful custody of an officer or employee of the District of Columbia or of the United States: or

(3)

An institution or facility, whether located in the District of Columbia or elsewhere, in which a person committed to the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services is placed.

(b)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 5 years, or both, said sentence to begin, if the person is an escaped prisoner, upon the expiration of the original sentence or disposition for the offense for which he or she was confined, committed, or in custody at the time of his or her escape.

History

July 15, 1932, 47 Stat. 698, ch. 492, § 8
June 6, 1940, 54 Stat. 243, ch. 254, § 6(a)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 574, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 157(b)
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 203, 41 DCR 2608
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 9, 58 DCR 1174
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 226, 60 DCR 2064
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 105, 60 DCR 3390

Cross References

Armed offenses, additional penalty for committing crime when armed, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
Repealer, acts inconsistent with this section, see § 24-407.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-112 and § 24-407.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2601.
1973 Ed., § 22-2601.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-377, in subsec. (a), deleted “or” from the end of par. (1), substituted “; or” for a period the end of par. (2), and added par. (3); and, in subsec. (b), substituted “original sentence or disposition for the offense for which he or she was confined, committed, or in custody at the time of his or her escape” for “original sentence”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (b).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320, in (a)(1), substituted “penal or correctional institution” for “penal institution” and deleted “judge, or commissioner” following “court”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 203 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 509 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 509 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary amendment of (a)(1), see § 105 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 105 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 226 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.